trunk/resultats/catalan.dic
abassegava/AZ
abonava/AZ
abrillantava/AZ
acagallonava/AZ
acarcanyava/AZ
accionava/AZ
aclocava/AZ
aconsellava/AZ
acreditava/AZ
acusava/AZ
admirava/AZ
adotzenava/AZ
afamegava/AZ
afetgegava/AZ
aflonjava/AZ
agafava/AZ
agilitava/AZ
agregava/AZ
agullonava/AZ
ajaçava/AZ
albergava/AZ
aliava/AZ
allisava/AZ
altercava/AZ
amagava/AZ
amartellava/AZ
amigrançava/AZ
amortallava/AZ
amuntonava/AZ
angelitzava/AZ
anomenava/AZ
aombrava/AZ
aparentava/AZ
apel·lava/AZ
aplacava/AZ
apomellava/AZ
aprestava/AZ
apunyalava/AZ
arcava/AZ
arpava/AZ
arranjava/AZ
arremorava/AZ
arrissava/AZ
arruixava/AZ
aspiava/AZ
assaïnava/AZ
assitiava/AZ
ataconava/AZ
aterrava/AZ
atracava/AZ
auditava/AZ
avantatjava/AZ
avinagrava/AZ
badocava/A
balbucejava/A
banquetejava/A
barrava/A
bastonejava/A
begallava/A
bescollejava/A
birbillejava/A
blegava/A
boleiava/A
bordonejava/A
botejava/A
branquejava/A
brivava/A
bruelava/A
bugonava/A
cabestrejava/A
cagaferrava/A
calcificava/A
calçava/A
canonejava/A
capbussava/A
capitulava/A
carabassejava/A
carenava/A
cartografiava/A
categoritzava/A
celebrava/A
cessava/A
cinturava/A
clapava/A
clissava/A
cobejava/A
colcava/A
col·lapsava/A
començava/A
compassava/A
comprovava/A
conculcava/A
confirmava/A
congraciava/A
connotava/A
consonantava/A
contemplava/A
contraforadava/A
contrapuntejava/A
convocava/A
corallejava/A
correlacionava/A
costerejava/A
crespava/A
crivellava/A
cuirassava/A
dalinava/A
debategava/A
decorticava/A
degollava/A
deliberava/A
denigrava/A
depreciava/A
desacatava/A
desadornava/A
desajustava/A
desamortitzava/A
desaprovava/A
desarrebossava/A
desarrugava/A
desavesava/A
desborrava/A
descabellava/A
descarbonitzava/A
descimalava/A
descompensava/A
descontrolava/A
descruava/A
desdotava/A
desembarassava/A
desembolicava/A
desembromallava/A
desemmerletava/A
desempaperava/A
desempernava/A
desempouava/A
desencalitjava/A
desencartonava/A
desencimbellava/A
desencourava/A
desenforinyava/A
desenllefernava/A
desensellava/A
desenvergava/A
desfermava/A
desgovernava/A
desinfectava/A
desmamava/A
desnatava/A
despallava/A
despopava/A
destapava/A
desvalorava/A
diagnosticava/A
dindava/A
distanciava/A
dotava/A
eixamenava/AZ
elucubrava/AZ
embarrancava/AZ
emborbollava/AZ
embrossava/AZ
emmatava/AZ
empalmava/AZ
empavonava/AZ
empiulava/AZ
emprenyava/AZ
encadirava/AZ
encapritxava/AZ
encavallava/AZ
enclavillava/AZ
encovenava/AZ
endolava/AZ
enfeudava/AZ
enfustava/AZ
engavatxinava/AZ
engualdrapava/AZ
enllistava/AZ
enrajolava/AZ
enrosava/AZ
ensivellava/AZ
entelava/AZ
entrebesava/AZ
entretallava/AZ
envergava/AZ
epilogava/AZ
esbalçava/AZ
esborrifava/AZ
escabridava/AZ
escanyussava/AZ
escassigallava/AZ
esconillava/AZ
escucutava/AZ
esgaldinyava/AZ
esgrumollava/AZ
esmolava/AZ
espatllava/AZ
espernegava/AZ
espitjava/AZ
espuntegava/AZ
estabulava/AZ
estifollava/AZ
estrangulava/AZ
esventrellava/AZ
excavava/AZ
expiava/AZ
exulcerava/AZ
farratjava/A
fiava/A
flagel·lava/A
fogallejava/A
formulava/A
freqüentava/A
furonejava/A
gansallava/A
gatejava/A
glaçava/A
granissava/A
gruava/A
habilitava/AZ
homogeneïtzava/AZ
immolava/AZ
incardinava/AZ
industriava/AZ
inquietava/AZ
interfoliava/AZ
iodurava/A
justejava/A
limitava/A
llastrava/A
lliurava/A
maduixava/A
mallava/A
mantornava/A
masegava/A
mencionava/A
metastatitzava/A
misserejava/A
moquejava/A
muntava/A
negava/A
normativitzava/A
occitanitzava/AZ
orbava/AZ
oxidava/AZ
panegiritzava/A
passamanava/A
pellicava/A
perillava/A
petarrellejava/A
pipellejava/A
plaçava/A
polsava/A
postulava/A
prenyava/A
processava/A
prorratejava/A
quadruplicava/A
radicalitzava/A
raspallava/A
rebatejava/A
recavava/A
recreava/A
reenvidava/A
refutava/A
rehabilitava/A
remeiava/A
reocupava/A
repreguntava/A
resquitllava/A
retorçava/A
revirava/A
roentava/A
ruboritzava/A
saldava/A
sanglotejava/A
semava/A
sililava/A
sobrecongelava/A
sofrenava/A
sonoritzava/A
suberitzava/A
supeditava/A
talonejava/A
taxava/A
terraplenava/A
titulava/A
tosquirava/A
translimitava/A
traumatitzava/A
tributava/A
trumfava/A
uniformitzava/AZ
vaporitzava/A
verinava/A
violentava/A
xacava/A
xerraquejava/A
zefirava/A
